Utah statutes.
4-34-3.   County surplus food collection and distribution system.
To accomplish the purposes of Section 4-34-2, any county may establish and
publicize the availability of a surplus food collection and distribution
system and may provide information to donee organizations concerning the
availability of agricultural products and to donors concerning organizations
that desire or need donated agricultural products. Any nonprofit charitable
organization needing agricultural products on a regular basis may be listed
with the county for the purpose of receiving notice that the products are
available.
